dictsource/ckb_rules
// Central Kurdish (Sorani, ckb) translation rules
// Sorani uses a modified Perso-Arabic script (33 letters) written
// right-to-left. Unlike Arabic/Persian it is almost a true alphabet:
// vowels are written, except short /I/ which is unwritten between
// consonants (rendered here as epenthetic I).
// This file is UTF-8 encoded.

.replace
	٠	0
	١	1
	٢	2
	٣	3
	٤	4
	٥	5
	٦	6
	٧	7
	٨	8
	٩	9
	۰	0
	۱	1
	۲	2
	۳	3
	۴	4
	۵	5
	۶	6
	۷	7
	۸	8
	۹	9
	ك	ک
	ي	ی
	ى	ی
	ة	ە
	ـ
// NOTE: ZWNJ (U+200C) is handled as hyphen via chars_ignore_zwnj_hyphen
// in tr_languages.c (same as Farsi), not here.

// Vowels (single letters; وو digraph handled in .group و)
.L01  ا ە ێ ی ۆ و ۇ ۊ

// Consonants
.L02  ب پ ت ج چ ح خ د ر ڕ ز ژ س ش ع غ ف ڤ ق ک گ ل ڵ م ن ھ ه ئ

// All letters
.L03  ا ە ێ ی ۆ و ۇ ۊ ب پ ت ج چ ح خ د ر ڕ ز ژ س ش ع غ ف ڤ ق ک گ ل ڵ م ن ھ ه ئ

.group ئ
	ئ	?

.group ا
	ا	a

.group ب
	ب	b

.group پ
	پ	p

.group ت
	ت	t

.group ج
	ج	dZ

.group چ
	چ	tS

.group ح
	ح	H

.group خ
	خ	x

.group د
	د	d

.group ر
	ر	*

.group ڕ
	ڕ	R

.group ز
	ز	z

.group ژ
	ژ	Z

.group س
	س	s

.group ش
	ش	S

.group ع
	ع	A

.group غ
	غ	gH

.group ف
	ف	f

.group ڤ
	ڤ	v

.group ق
	ق	q

.group ک
	ک	c (ێ
	ک	c (ی
	ک	k

.group گ
	گ	J (ێ
	گ	J (ی
	گ	g

.group ل
	ل	l

.group ڵ
	ڵ	L

.group م
	م	m

.group ن
	ن	n

.group و
	وو	u:
	و	(L01	w
	_) و	(L01	w
	L01) و	(_	w
	L01) و	(L02	w
	و	U

.group ۆ
	ۆ	o

.group ۇ
	ۇ	U

.group ۊ
	ۊ	y

.group ھ
	ھ	h

.group ه
	ه	h

.group ە
	ە	E

.group ی
	_) ی	(L01	j
	L01) ی	(L01	j
	L01) ی	(_	j
	ی	i

.group ێ
	ێ	e
